New York, session 2025-2026, S2549.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 259-b of the executive law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 2-a to read as follows: 3 2-a. With respect to members appointed or reappointed on and after the 4 effective date of this subdivision, the state board of parole shall be 5 so constituted that the proportion of the members residing in any county 6 of the state shall be reasonably equivalent and in the same proportion 7 as the resident county of the incarcerated individual population bears 8 to the total population of the state. 9 § 2. Section 259-d of the executive law is amended by adding a new 10 subdivision 3 to read as follows: 11 3. With respect to members appointed or reappointed on and after the 12 effective date of this subdivision, the state board of parole shall be 13 so constituted that the proportion of the hearing officers residing in 14 any county of the state shall be reasonably equivalent and in the same 15 proportion as the resident county of the incarcerated individual popu- 16 lation bears to the total population of the state. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 18 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06786-01-5